Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.190

Assistance with submission of Washington state identicard application materials.

The department shall assist licensed or contracted providers in following the process established under RCW 46.20.036 for providers submitting Washington state identicard application materials for individuals qualifying for a Washington state identicard under RCW 46.20.117(1)(c)(ii).

[ 2020 c 124 s 1.]